Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-627.02
Adoption of foreign-born person; birth certificate; contents.

Upon receipt of a Report of Adoption or a certified copy of a decree of adoption issued by any court of competent jurisdiction in the State of Nebraska as to any foreign-born person, the department shall prepare a birth certificate in the new name of the adopted person. The birth certificate shall show specifically (1) the new name of the adopted person, (2) the date of birth and sex of the adopted person, (3) statistical information concerning the adoptive parents in place of the natural parents, and (4) the true or probable place of birth including the city or town and country.

Laws 1961, c. 342, § 4, p. 1094;

Laws 1980, LB 681, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 32;

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 540;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 159;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 433.